apertium-is-sv.sv.dix
<pardef n="n/ysa__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ysa</l>       <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yser</l>      <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yses</l>      <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yste</l>      <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yst</l>       <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ys</l>        <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ysande</l>    <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="avbr/yta__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>yta</l>       <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yter</l>      <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytes</l>      <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öt</l>        <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>utit</l>      <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yt</l>        <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytande</l>    <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uten</l>      <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>utet</l>      <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>utna</l>      <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kl/yva__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>yva</l>       <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yver</l>      <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yvs</l>       <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öv</l>        <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yde</l>       <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uvit</l>      <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yvt</l>       <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yv</l>        <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yvande</l>    <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uven</l>      <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uvet</l>      <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uvna</l>      <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="best/å__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>         <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>år</l>        <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ås</l>        <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>od</l>        <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ått</l>       <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>         <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ående</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ådd</l>       <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ått</l>       <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ådda</l>      <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="st/å__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>         <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>år</l>        <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ås</l>        <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>od</l>        <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>og</l>        <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ått</l>       <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>         <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ående</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ånden</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åndet</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åndna</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="g/å__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>         <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>år</l>        <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ås</l>        <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ick</l>       <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ått</l>       <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ående</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ången</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ånget</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ångna</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="brän/na__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>na<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ner</l>       <r>na<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r>na<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>na<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>na<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>na<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nande</l>     <r>na<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>na<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>na<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>na<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="bistå"><i>bist</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="framstå"><i>framst</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bryta"><i>br</i><par n="avbr/yta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="utgå"><i>utg</i><par n="g/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="föregå"><i>föreg</i><par n="g/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="övergå"><i>överg</i><par n="g/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gå"><i>g</i><par n="g/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="avstå"><i>avst</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="undgå"><i>undg</i><par n="g/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="begå"><i>beg</i><par n="g/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fortgå"><i>fortg</i><par n="g/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kvarstå"><i>kvarst</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="knyta"><i>kn</i><par n="avbr/yta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="avbryta"><i>avbr</i><par n="avbr/yta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="framgå"><i>framg</i><par n="g/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="uppstå"><i>uppst</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kringgå"><i>kringg</i><par n="g/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="uppgå"><i>uppg</i><par n="g/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bestå"><i>best</i><par n="best/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="avgå"><i>avg</i><par n="g/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="förstå"><i>först</i><par n="best/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="utbyta"><i>utb</i><par n="avbr/yta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tillmötesgå"><i>tillmötesg</i><par n="g/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="återgå"><i>återg</i><par n="g/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stå"><i>st</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="påstå"><i>påst</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pågå"><i>påg</i><par n="g/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="angå"><i>ang</i><par n="g/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="återstå"><i>återst</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="genomgå"><i>genomg</i><par n="g/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="byta"><i>b</i><par n="avbr/yta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ingå"><i>ing</i><par n="g/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="känna"><i>kän</i><par n="brän/na__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="utstå"><i>utst</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stå">             <i>st</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bestå">           <i>best</i><par n="best/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="förstå">          <i>först</i><par n="best/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="missförstå">      <i>missförst</i><par n="best/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gå">              <i>g</i><par n="g/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ingå">            <i>ing</i><par n="g/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="avbryta">         <i>avbr</i><par n="avbr/yta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bränna">          <i>brän</i><par n="brän/na__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="känna">           <i>kän</i><par n="brän/na__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bryta">           <i>br</i><par n="avbr/yta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="klyva">           <i>kl</i><par n="kl/yva__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nysa">            <i>n</i><par n="n/ysa__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skryta">          <i>skr</i><par n="avbr/yta__vblex"/></e>
